Utah statutes.
13-25a-106.   Enforcement.
(1)  The division shall investigate and assess administrative fines for
violations of this chapter.
(2) (a)  Upon referral from the division, the attorney general or any district
or county attorney may:
(i)  bring an action for temporary or permanent injunctive or other relief in
any court of competent jurisdiction for any violation of this chapter;
(ii)  upon entry of final judgment, award restitution when appropriate to any
person suffering loss because of a violation of this part if proof of loss is
submitted to the satisfaction of the court; or
(iii)  bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction for the
collection of penalties authorized under Subsection 13-25a-105(1).
(b)  In an action under Subsection (2)(a), the attorney general or any
district or county attorney may recover costs, including investigative costs
and attorney fees, from any violator of this chapter.
